Washington statutes.
RCW 11.100.047

Fiduciary—Duty to diversify.

Subject to the provisions of RCW 11.100.060 and any express provisions in the trust instrument to the contrary, a fiduciary shall diversify the investments of the trust unless the fiduciary reasonably determines that, because of special circumstances, the purposes of the trust are better served without diversifying.

[ 1995 c 307 s 5.]

NOTES:

Application—1995 c 307: See note following RCW 11.100.010.